Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
важчати/I
вужчати/I
вивуджувати/H
вив╕дати/I
виглядати/I
вигорати/I
вигороджувати/H
видужати/I
видряпати/I
вичерпувати/H
виймати/I
виказати/J
викликати/I
викрикувати/H
вилучати/I
вилизати/J
вил╕ковувати/H
вимазати/J
вимерзати/I
випускати/I
випробувати/H
висихати/I
вискакувати/H
вислухати/I
вистукувати/H
витати/I
виточувати/H
визирати/I
визр╕вати/I
вибудувати/H
вибивати/I
в╕двикати/I
в╕дв'язати/J
в╕дгвинчувати/H
в╕дгинати/I
в╕дщипувати/H
в╕д╕гравати/I
в╕дкушувати/H
в╕дкидати/I
в╕длежувати/H
в╕длучати/I
в╕дмикати/I
в╕дмокати/I
в╕дпирати/I
в╕дпрошувати/H
в╕дпочивати/I
в╕друбувати/H
в╕др╕зати/J
в╕дс╕вати/I
в╕дскакувати/H
в╕дстригати/I
в╕дточувати/H
в╕дхаркувати/H
в╕дбирати/I
в╕тати/I
включати/I
влаштувати/H
вникати/I
вручати/I
вр╕вноважувати/H
вр╕зати/J
вступати/I
в'язати/J
вшанувати/H
вбивати/I
воскресати/I
гарантувати/H
гарн╕шати/I
г╕пертрофувати/H
гмикати/I
гримасувати/H
готувати/H
фам╕льярничати/I
фетишизувати/H
ф╕н╕шувати/H
форсувати/H
авторизувати/H
адм╕н╕струвати/H
айкати/I
актуал╕зувати/H
амортизувати/H
апробувати/H
атестувати/H
дарувати/H
децентрал╕зувати/H
деморал╕зувати/H
дезор╕╓нтувати/H
думати/I
дисквал╕ф╕кувати/H
дратувати/H
дригати/I
довшати/I
догризати/I
додрукувати/H
до╖жджати/I
доказати/J
докладати/I
докопувати/H
дол╕тати/I
допомагати/I
досадувати/H
дослухати/I
добудувати/H
добивати/I
експортувати/H
угамовувати/H
угорати/I
указати/J
улагоджувати/H
уливати/I
умазати/J
уникати/I
упаковувати/H
упихати/I
ур╕зати/J
усихати/I
усмоктувати/H
утирати/I
утолковувати/H
ушивати/I
убувати/H
убирати/I
чиркати/I
цив╕л╕зувати/H
цмокати/I
╕люструвати/H
╕нвертувати/H
╕нспектувати/H
╕нтригувати/H
кантувати/H
карати/I
казати/J
керувати/H
кукур╕кати/I
кивати/I
клепати/I
кремувати/H
колупати/I
командувати/H
конвертувати/H
конкретизувати/H
коронувати/H
ладнати/I
легувати/H
лунати/I
лизати/J
ляскати/I
локал╕зувати/H
марширувати/H
мазати/J
махати/I
мудрувати/H
м╕ркувати/H
моргати/I
мотивувати/H
навчати/I
нав'язати/J
нав'язувати/H
нагадати/I
награвати/I
нафарбувати/H
надати/I
надпивати/I
надр╕зати/J
нацькувати/H
наймати/I
наказати/J
накривати/I
накочувати/H
налягати/I
намазати/J
нам╕тати/I
намотувати/H
напухати/I
наповзати/I
нар╕зати/J
наряджати/I
нарощувати/H
насп╕вувати/H
настигати/I
нат╕кати/I
нашивати/I
набальзамувати/H
наближати/I
нявкати/I
ночувати/H
пам'ятати/I
паразитувати/H
перевершувати/H
перев'язати/J
переглядати/I
перегортати/I
перегороджувати/H
передчувати/H
передбачати/I
перейменувати/H
переказати/J
перекладати/I
перекрикувати/H
перел╕зати/I
перелюбствувати/H
перемикати/I
переписувати/H
переповзати/I
перерахувати/H
перер╕зати/J
пересипати/I
пересл╕дувати/H
переступати/I
перезаряджати/I
перехльостувати/H
перебирати/I
переор╕╓нтувати/H
пирхати/I
п╕двищувати/H
п╕дв'язати/J
п╕дгинати/I
п╕дчищати/I
п╕дказати/J
п╕дказувати/H
п╕дкидати/I
п╕дл╕тати/I
п╕дм╕тати/I
п╕дморгувати/H
п╕дпирати/I
п╕друбувати/H
п╕др╕зати/J
п╕дсилати/I
п╕дсмажувати/H
п╕дступати/I
п╕дтримувати/H
п╕дтягати/I
п╕дб╕гати/I
планувати/H
плутати/I
приватизувати/H
прив'язати/J
приглушати/I
придушувати/H
причащати/I
прикладати/I
приладновувати/H
прил╕тати/I
прим╕чати/I
припл╕тати/I
прирахувати/H
прир╕зати/J
присилати/I
пристосувати/H
притихати/I
пришивати/I
прибудувати/H
провертати/I
прогнозувати/H
проживати/I
проанал╕зувати/H
прочищати/I
прочитувати/H
прокачувати/H
прокладати/I
проламувати/H
прол╕зати/I
промазати/J
промокати/I
пронизати/J
пропагувати/H
пропивати/I
проривати/I
прор╕зати/J
пророкувати/H
прос╕вати/I
простувати/H
протестувати/H
протухати/I
прозивати/I
психувати/H
пхати/I
повисати/I
пов'язати/J
пофарбувати/H
пощипувати/H
почивати/I
показати/J
покращати/I
полегшувати/H
помазати/J
помирати/I
пом'якшувати/H
пор╕зати/J
посвистувати/H
потискувати/H
поз╕хати/I
похитувати/H
рац╕онал╕зувати/H
регресувати/H
рецензувати/H
реставрувати/H
рухати/I
римувати/H
р╕дшати/I
р╕зати/J
розвивати/I
розв'язати/J
розгладжувати/H
розглядати/I
розжалувати/H
роздавати/I
роздратовувати/H
розцв╕тати/I
розказати/J
розказувати/H
розкидати/I
розкривати/I
розлючувати/H
розмазати/J
розмикати/I
розм╕шувати/H
розн╕мати/I
розпечатувати/H
розпивати/I
розповсюджувати/H
розривати/I
розр╕зати/J
розсовувати/H
розтинати/I
роз'╓днувати/H
розхватувати/H
розбухати/I
сватати/I
святкувати/H
сентиментальничати/I
серв╕рувати/H
син╕шати/I
синтезувати/H
сказати/J
скуповувати/H
скидати/I
скромничати/I
сконцентрувати/H
сн╕дати/I
спалахувати/H
сп╕вати/I
сп╕в╕снувати/H
сприймати/I
спрямувати/H
спробувати/H
сповзати/I
спонукати/I
стьобати/I
стенографувати/H
стирати/I
страждати/I
стримувати/H
стрясати/I
совати/I
тасувати/H
турбувати/H
т╕кати/I
транспонувати/H
тон╕зувати/H
торсати/I
звинувачувати/H
зв'язати/J
згадувати/H
згортати/I
завершувати/H
зависати/I
зав'язати/J
загвинчувати/H
заг╕псувати/H
загнивати/I
заф╕ксувати/H
задушувати/H
задирати/I
зач╕сувати/H
закушувати/H
закидати/I
законсп╕рувати/H
зализати/J
зал╕тати/I
замазати/J
замазувати/H
замотувати/H
запановувати/H
запихати/I
заплутувати/H
зарахувати/H
заручати/I
зар╕зати/J
засувати/H
зас╕кати/I
засм╕чувати/H
застосовувати/H
затухати/I
затримувати/H
зазивати/I
заштрихувати/H
забувати/H
здушувати/H
зчищати/I
з╕стрибувати/H
злизати/J
зловживати/I
змазати/J
змучувати/H
знаджувати/H
знемагати/I
зруйнувати/H
зр╕зати/J
з'ясовувати/H
збер╕гати/I
зближувати/H
зобов'язати/J
шастати/I
шаткувати/H
штампувати/H
штопати/I
харчувати/H
ховати/I
базарувати/H
буксирувати/H
благати/I
бланширувати/H
бомбардувати/H
оглядати/I
окупувати/H
омивати/I
оперезати/J
опубл╕кувати/H
опротестовувати/H
ор╕╓нтувати/H
осв╕жати/I
осп╕вувати/H
означати/I
оштрафувати/H
обв'язати/J
обгороджувати/H
обживати/I
об'╖жджати/I
обкопувати/H
облизати/J
обмахувати/H
обмивати/I
обписувати/H
обрубувати/H
обр╕зати/J
обростати/I
оббирати/I
